California statutes. Family Code
(a) Upon application by a minor, the court may summarily grant consent for medical care or dental care or both for the minor if the court determines all of the following:

(1) The minor is 16 years of age or older and resides in this state.

(2) The consent of a parent or guardian is necessary to permit the medical care or dental care or both, and the minor has no parent or guardian available to give the consent.

(b) No fee may be charged for proceedings under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Consent by Minor [6920. - 6930.]

6920.

Subject to the limitations provided in this chapter, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a minor may consent to the matters provided in this chapter, and the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian is not necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6921.

A consent given by a minor under this chapter is not subject to disaffirmance because of minority.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6922.

(a) A minor may consent to the minor’s medical care, vision care, or dental care if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The minor is 15 years of age or older.

(2) The minor is living separate and apart from the minor’s parents or guardian, whether with or without the
 parent’s or guardian’s consent and regardless of the duration of the separate residence.

(3) The minor is managing the minor’s own financial affairs, regardless of the source of the minor’s income.

(b) The parents or guardian are not liable for medical care, vision care, or dental care provided pursuant to this section.

(c) A physician and surgeon, optometrist, or dentist may, with or without the consent of the minor patient, advise the minor’s parent or guardian of the treatment given or needed if the physician and surgeon, optometrist, or dentist has reason to know, on the basis of the information given by the minor, the whereabouts of the parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 152, Sec. 2.   (SB 457)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6924.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Mental health treatment or counseling services” means the provision of mental health treatment or counseling on an outpatient basis by any of the following:

(A) A governmental agency.

(B) A person or agency having a contract with a governmental agency to provide the services.

(C) An agency that receives funding from community united funds.

(D) A runaway house or crisis resolution center.

(E) A professional person, as defined in paragraph (2).

(2) “Professional person” means either of the following:

(A) A professional person as defined in Section 124260 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The chief administrator of an agency referred to in paragraph (1) or (3).

(3) “Residential shelter services” means any of the following:

(A) The provision of residential and other support services to minors on a temporary or emergency basis in a facility that services only minors by a governmental agency, a person or agency having a contract with a governmental agency to provide these services, an agency that receives funding from community funds, or a licensed community care
 facility or crisis resolution center.

(B) The provision of other support services on a temporary or emergency basis by any professional person as defined in paragraph (2).

(b) A minor who is 12 years of age or older may consent to mental health treatment or counseling on an outpatient basis, or to residential shelter services, if the minor, in the opinion of the attending professional person, is mature enough to participate intelligently in the outpatient services or residential shelter services.

(c) A professional person offering residential shelter services, whether as an individual or as a representative of an entity specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), shall make their best efforts to notify the parent or guardian of the provision of services.

(d) The mental health treatment or counseling of a minor authorized by this section shall include involvement of the minor’s parent or guardian unless the professional person who is treating or counseling the minor, after consulting with the minor, determines that the involvement would be inappropriate. The professional person who is treating or counseling the minor shall state in the client record whether and when the person attempted to contact the minor’s parent or guardian, and whether the attempt to contact was successful or unsuccessful, or the reason why, in the professional person’s opinion, it would be inappropriate to contact the minor’s parent or guardian.

(e) The minor’s parents or guardian are not liable for payment for mental health treatment or counseling services provided pursuant to this section unless the parent or guardian participates in the mental health treatment or counseling, and then only for services
 rendered with the participation of the parent or guardian. The minor’s parents or guardian are not liable for payment for any residential shelter services provided pursuant to this section unless the parent or guardian consented to the provision of those services.

(f) This section does not authorize a minor to receive convulsive therapy or psychosurgery as defined in subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 5325 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or psychotropic drugs without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 338, Sec. 3.   (AB 665)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6925.

(a) A minor may consent to medical care related to the prevention or treatment of pregnancy.

(b) This section does not authorize a minor to be sterilized without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 12.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6926.

(a) A minor who is 12 years of age or older and who may have come into contact with an infectious, contagious, or communicable disease may consent to medical care related to the diagnosis or treatment of the disease, if the disease or condition is one that is required by law or regulation adopted pursuant to law to be reported to the local health officer, or is a related sexually transmitted disease, as may be determined by the State Public Health Officer.

(b) A minor who is 12 years of age or older may consent to medical care related to the prevention of a sexually transmitted disease.

(c) The minor’s parents or guardian are not liable for payment for medical care provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.   (AB 499)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6927.

A minor who is 12 years of age or older and who is alleged to have been raped may consent to medical care related to the diagnosis or treatment of the condition and the collection of medical evidence with regard to the alleged rape.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6928.

(a) “Sexually assaulted” as used in this section includes, but is not limited to, conduct coming within Section 261, 286, or 287 of the Penal Code.

(b) A minor who is alleged to have been sexually assaulted may consent to medical care related to the diagnosis and treatment of the condition, and the collection of medical evidence with regard to the alleged sexual assault.

(c) The professional person providing medical treatment shall attempt to contact the minor’s parent or guardian and shall note in the minor’s treatment record the date and time the professional person attempted to
 contact the parent or guardian and whether the attempt was successful or unsuccessful. This subdivision does not apply if the professional person reasonably believes that the minor’s parent or guardian committed the sexual assault on the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 25.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6929.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Counseling” means the provision of counseling services by a provider under a contract with the state or a county to provide alcohol or drug abuse counseling services pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or pursuant to Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 11750) of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Drug or alcohol” includes, but is not limited to, any substance listed in any of the following:

(A) Section 380 or 381 of the Penal Code.

(B) Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code.

(3) “LAAM” means levoalphacetylmethadol as specified in paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) of Section 11055 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Professional person” means a physician and surgeon, registered nurse, psychologist, clinical social worker, professional clinical counselor, marriage and family therapist, registered marriage and family therapist intern when appropriately employed and supervised pursuant to Section 4980.43 of the Business and Professions Code, psychological assistant when appropriately employed and supervised pursuant to Section 2913 of the Business and
 Professions Code, associate clinical social worker when appropriately employed and supervised pursuant to Section 4996.18 of the Business and Professions Code, or registered clinical counselor intern when appropriately employed and supervised pursuant to Section 4999.42 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) A minor who is 12 years of age or older may consent to medical care and counseling relating to the diagnosis and treatment of a drug- or alcohol-related problem.

(c) The treatment plan of a minor authorized by this section shall include the involvement of the minor’s parent or guardian, if appropriate, as determined by the professional person or treatment facility treating the minor. The professional person providing medical care or counseling to a minor shall state in the minor’s
 treatment record whether and when the professional person attempted to contact the minor’s parent or guardian, and whether the attempt to contact the parent or guardian was successful or unsuccessful, or the reason why, in the opinion of the professional person, it would not be appropriate to contact the minor’s parent or guardian.

(d) The minor’s parent or guardian is not liable for payment for care provided to a minor pursuant to this section, except that if the minor’s parent or guardian participates in a counseling program pursuant to this section, the parent or guardian is liable for the cost of the services provided to the minor and the parent or guardian.

(e) (1) This
 section does not authorize a minor to receive replacement narcotic therapy, in a program licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 11839) of Chapter 10 of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a minor 16 years of age or older may consent to receive medications for opioid use disorder from a licensed narcotic treatment program as replacement narcotic therapy without the consent of the minor’s parent or guardian only if, and to the extent, expressly permitted by federal law.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state shall respect the right of a parent or legal guardian to seek medical care and counseling for a drug- or alcohol-related problem of a minor child when the child does not consent to the medical care and counseling, and nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict or eliminate this right.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, when a parent or legal guardian has sought the medical care and counseling for a
 drug- or alcohol-related problem of a minor child, the physician and surgeon shall disclose medical information concerning the care to the minor’s parent or legal guardian upon the parent’s or guardian’s request, even if the minor child does not consent to disclosure, without liability for the disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6929.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, a minor 16 years of age or older may consent to opioid use disorder treatment that uses buprenorphine at a physician’s office, clinic, or health facility, by a licensed physician and surgeon or other health care provider acting within the scope of their practice, whether or not the minor also has the consent of their parent or guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 456, Sec. 2.   (AB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

6930.

(a) A minor who is 12 years of age or older and who states that the minor is injured as a result of intimate partner violence may consent to medical care related to the diagnosis or treatment of the injury and the collection of medical evidence with regard to the alleged intimate partner violence.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “intimate partner violence” means an intentional or reckless infliction of bodily harm that is perpetrated by a person with whom the minor has or has had a sexual, dating, or spousal relationship.

(2) This section does not apply when a minor is an alleged victim of rape, as defined in Section 261 of the Penal Code, in which case Section 6927 shall
 apply, and does not apply when a minor is alleged to have been sexually assaulted, as described in Section 6928, in which case that section shall apply.

(c) If the health practitioner providing treatment believes that the injuries described in subdivision (a) require a report pursuant to Section 11160 of the Penal Code, the health practitioner shall do both of the following:

(1) Inform the minor that the report will be made.

(2) Attempt to contact the minor’s parent or guardian and inform them of the report. The health practitioner shall note in the minor’s treatment record the date and time of the attempt to contact the parent or guardian and whether the attempt was successful or unsuccessful. This paragraph does not apply if the health practitioner reasonably believes that the minor’s parent or guardian committed
 the intimate partner violence on the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 11.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. ENLISTMENT IN ARMED FORCES [6950. - 6950.]

6950.

(a) Upon application by a minor, the court may summarily grant consent for enlistment by the minor in the armed forces of the United States if the court determines all of the following:

(1) The minor is 16 years of age or older and resides in this state.

(2) The consent of a parent or guardian is necessary to permit the enlistment, and the minor has no parent or guardian available to give the consent.

(b) No fee may be charged for proceedings under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. EMANCIPATION OF MINORS LAW [7000. - 7143.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [7000. - 7002.]

7000.

This part may be cited as the Emancipation of Minors Law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

It is the purpose of this part to provide a clear statement defining emancipation and its consequences and to permit an emancipated minor to obtain a court declaration of the minor’s status. This part is not intended to affect the status of minors who may become emancipated under the decisional case law that was in effect before the enactment of Chapter 1059 of the Statutes of 1978.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

A person under the age of 18 years is an emancipated minor if any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The person has entered into a valid marriage, or has established a valid domestic partnership, regardless of whether the marriage or the domestic partnership has been dissolved.

(b) The person is on active duty with the Armed Forces of the United States.

(c) The person has received a declaration of emancipation pursuant to Section 7122.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 660, Sec. 9.   (SB 273)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Effect of Emancipation [7050. - 7052.]

7050.

An emancipated minor shall be considered as being an adult for the following purposes:

(a) The minor’s right to support by the minor’s parents.

(b) The right of the minor’s parents to the minor’s earnings and to control the minor.

(c) The application of Sections 300 and 601 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) Ending all vicarious or imputed liability of the minor’s parents or guardian for the minor’s torts. Nothing in this section affects any liability of a parent, guardian, spouse, or employer imposed by the Vehicle Code, or any vicarious liability that arises from an agency relationship.

(e) The minor’s capacity to do any of the following:

(1) Consent to medical, dental, or psychiatric care, without parental consent, knowledge, or liability.

(2) Enter into a binding contract or give
 a delegation of power.

(3) Buy, sell, lease, encumber, exchange, or transfer an interest in real or personal property, including, but not limited to, shares of stock in a domestic or foreign corporation or a membership in a nonprofit corporation.

(4) Sue or be sued in the minor’s own name.

(5) Compromise, settle, arbitrate, or otherwise adjust a claim, action, or proceeding by or against the minor.

(6) Make or revoke a will.

(7) Make a gift, outright or in trust.

(8) Convey or release contingent or expectant interests in property, including marital property rights and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy, and consent to a transfer, encumbrance, or gift of marital property.

(9) Exercise or release the minor’s powers as donee of a power of appointment unless the creating instrument otherwise
 provides.

(10) Create for the minor’s own benefit or for the benefit of others a revocable or irrevocable trust.

(11) Revoke a revocable trust.

(12) Elect to take under or against a will.

(13) Renounce or disclaim any interest acquired by testate or intestate succession or by inter vivos transfer, including exercise of the right to surrender the right to revoke a revocable trust.

(14) Make an election referred to in Section 13502 of, or an election and agreement referred to in Section 13503 of, the Probate Code.

(15) Establish the minor’s own residence.

(16) Apply for a work permit pursuant to Section 49110 of the Education Code without the request of the minor’s parents.

(17) Enroll in a school or college.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7051.

An insurance contract entered into by an emancipated minor has the same effect as if it were entered into by an adult and, with respect to that contract, the minor has the same rights, duties, and liabilities as an adult.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7052.

With respect to shares of stock in a domestic or foreign corporation held by an emancipated minor, a membership in a nonprofit corporation held by an emancipated minor, or other property held by an emancipated minor, the minor may do all of the following:

(a) Vote in person, and give proxies to exercise any voting rights, with respect to the shares, membership, or property.

(b) Waive notice of any meeting or give consent to the holding of any meeting.

(c) Authorize, ratify, approve, or confirm any action that could be taken by shareholders, members, or property owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Court Declaration of Emancipation [7110. - 7143.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [7110. - 7111.]

7110.

It is the intent of the Legislature that proceedings under this part be as simple and inexpensive as possible. To that end, the Judicial Council is requested to prepare and distribute to the clerks of the superior courts appropriate forms for the proceedings that are suitable for use by minors acting as their own counsel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7111.

The issuance of a declaration of emancipation does not entitle the minor to any benefits under Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code which would not otherwise accrue to an emancipated minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure for Declaration [7120. - 7123.]

7120.

(a) A minor may petition the superior court of the county in which the minor resides or is temporarily domiciled for a declaration of emancipation.

(b) The petition shall set forth with specificity all of the following facts:

(1) The minor is at least 14 years of age.

(2) The minor willingly lives separate and apart from the minor’s parents or guardian with the consent or acquiescence of the minor’s parents or guardian.

(3) The minor is managing their own financial
 affairs. As evidence of this, the minor shall complete and attach a declaration of income and expenses as provided in Judicial Council form FL-150.

(4) The source of the minor’s income is not derived from any activity declared to be a crime by the laws of this state or the laws of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 79.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.

(a) Before the petition for a declaration of emancipation is heard, notice the court determines is reasonable shall be given to the minor’s parents, guardian, or other person entitled to the custody of the minor, or proof shall be made to the court that their addresses are unknown or that for other reasons the notice cannot be given.

(b) The clerk of the court shall also notify the local child support agency of the county in which the matter is to be heard of the proceeding. If the minor is a ward of the court, notice shall be given to the probation department. If the child is a dependent child of the court, notice shall be given to the county welfare department.

(c) The notice shall include a form whereby the minor’s parents, guardian, or other person entitled to the custody of the minor may give their written consent to the petitioner’s emancipation. The notice shall include a warning that a court may void
 or rescind the declaration of emancipation and the parents may become liable for support and medical insurance coverage pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4000) of Part 2 of Division 9 and Sections 17400, 17402, 17404, and 17422.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 365, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7122.

(a) The court shall sustain the petition if it finds that the minor is a person described by Section 7120 and that emancipation would not be contrary to the minor’s best interest.

(b) If the petition is sustained, the court shall forthwith issue a declaration of emancipation, which shall be filed by the clerk of the court.

(c) A declaration is conclusive evidence that the minor is emancipated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7123.

(a) If the petition is denied, the minor has a right to file a petition for a writ of mandate.

(b) If the petition is sustained, the parents or guardian have a right to file a petition for a writ of mandate if they have appeared in the proceeding and opposed the granting of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voiding or Rescinding Declaration [7130. - 7135.]

7130.

(a) A declaration of emancipation obtained by fraud or by the withholding of material information is voidable.

(b) A declaration of emancipation of a minor who is indigent and has no means of support is subject to rescission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7131.

A petition to void a declaration of emancipation on the ground that the declaration was obtained by fraud or by the withholding of material information may be filed by any person or by any public or private agency. The petition shall be filed in the court that made the declaration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7132.

(a) A petition to rescind a declaration of emancipation on the ground that the minor is indigent and has no means of support may be filed by the minor declared emancipated, by the minor’s conservator, or by the district attorney of the county in which the minor resides. The petition shall be filed in the county in which the minor or the conservator resides.

(b) The minor may be considered indigent if the minor’s only source of income is from public assistance benefits. The court shall consider the impact of the rescission of the declaration of emancipation on the minor and shall find the rescission of the declaration of emancipation will not be contrary to the best interest of the minor before granting the order to rescind.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7133.

(a) Before a petition under this article is heard, notice the court determines is reasonable shall be given to the minor’s parents or guardian, or proof shall be made to the court that their addresses are unknown or that for other reasons the notice cannot be given.

(b) The notice to parents shall state that if the declaration of emancipation is voided or rescinded, the parents may be liable to provide support and medical insurance coverage for the child pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4000) of Part 2 of Division 9 of this code and Sections 11350, 11350.1, 11475.1, and 11490 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) No liability accrues to a parent or guardian not given actual notice, as a result of voiding or rescinding the declaration of emancipation, until that parent or guardian is given actual notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 159.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7134.

If the petition is sustained, the court shall forthwith issue an order voiding or rescinding the declaration of emancipation, which shall be filed by the clerk of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

7135.

Voiding or rescission of the declaration of emancipation does not alter any contractual obligation or right or any property right or interest that arose during the period that the declaration was in effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Identification Cards and Information [7140. - 7143.]

7140.

On application of a minor declared emancipated under this chapter, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall enter identifying information in its law enforcement computer network, and the fact of emancipation shall be stated on the department’s identification card issued to the emancipated minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7141.

A person who, in good faith, has examined a minor’s identification card and relies on a minor’s representation that the minor is emancipated, has the same rights and obligations as if the minor were in fact emancipated at the time of the representation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7142.

No public entity or employee is liable for any loss or injury resulting directly or indirectly from false or inaccurate information contained in the Department of Motor Vehicles records system or identification cards as provided in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7143.

If a declaration of emancipation is voided or rescinded, notice shall be sent immediately to the Department of Motor Vehicles which shall remove the information relating to emancipation in its law enforcement computer network. Any identification card issued stating emancipation shall be invalidated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. PARENT AND CHILD RELATIONSHIP [7500. - 7962.]



PART 1. RIGHTS OF PARENTS [7500. - 7507.]

7500.

(a) The mother of an unemancipated minor child, and the father, if presumed to be the father under Section 7611, are equally entitled to the services and earnings of the child.

(b) If one parent is dead, is unable or refuses to take custody, or has abandoned the child, the other parent is entitled to the services and earnings of the child.

(c) This section shall not apply to any services or earnings of an unemancipated minor child related to a contract of a type described in Section 6750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 940, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7501.

(a) A parent entitled to the custody of a child has a right to change the residence of the child, subject to the power of the court to restrain a removal that would prejudice the rights or welfare of the child.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to affirm the decision in In re Marriage of Burgess (1996) 13 Cal.4th 25, and to declare that ruling to be the public policy and law of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7502.

The parent, as such, has no control over the property of the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7503.

The employer of a minor shall pay the earnings of the minor to the minor until the parent or guardian entitled to the earnings gives the employer notice that the parent or guardian claims the earnings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 166.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7504.

The parent, whether solvent or insolvent, may relinquish to the child the right of controlling the child and receiving the child’s earnings. Abandonment by the parent is presumptive evidence of that relinquishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 167.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7505.

The authority of a parent ceases on any of the following:

(a) The appointment, by a court, of a guardian of the person of the child.

(b) The marriage of the child.

(c) The child attaining the age of majority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 168.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.

Where a child, after attaining the age of majority, continues to serve and to be supported by the parent, neither party is entitled to compensation, in the absence of an agreement for the compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.

The abuse of parental authority is the subject of judicial cognizance in a civil action brought by the child, or by the child’s relative within the third degree, or by the supervisors of the county where the child resides; and when the abuse is established, the child may be freed from the dominion of the parent, and the duty of support and education enforced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 170.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PRESUMPTION CONCERNING CHILD OF MARRIAGE AND GENETIC TESTING TO DETERMINE PARENTAGE [7540. - 7581.]



  CHAPTER 1. Child of Wife Cohabiting With Husband [7540. - 7541.]

7540.

(a) Except as provided in Section 7541, the child of spouses who cohabited at the time of conception and birth is conclusively presumed to be a child of the marriage.

(b) The conclusive marital presumption in subdivision (a) does not apply if the court determines that the husband of the woman who gave birth was impotent or sterile at the time of conception and that the child was not conceived through assisted reproduction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 5.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7541.

(a) If the court finds that the spouse who is a presumed parent under Section 7540 is not a genetic parent of the child pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7550), the question of parentage shall be resolved in accordance with all other applicable provisions of this division, including, but not limited to, Section 7612.

(b) An action to challenge the parentage of the spouse who is a presumed parent under Section 7540 shall be filed and served not later than two years from the child’s date of birth and may only be filed by any of the following:

(1) By either spouse.

(2) By a person who is a presumed parent under Section 7611 or by the child, through or by the child’s guardian ad litem, to establish the parentage of the person who is a presumed parent under Section 7611.

(c) The petition or motion to challenge a presumption under Section 7540 pursuant to this section shall be supported by a declaration under oath submitted by the moving party stating the factual basis for placing the issue of parentage before the court.

(d) Genetic testing may not be used to challenge parentage, in either of the following cases:

(1) A case that reached final judgment of parentage on or before September 30, 1980.

(2) A case
 challenging the parentage of a spouse who is a parent pursuant to Section 7962 or subdivision (a) of Section 7613, except to resolve a dispute regarding whether the child was conceived through assisted reproduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 80.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Genetic Testing to Determine Parentage [7550. - 7562.]

7550.

This chapter shall govern both of the following:

(a) The genetic testing of a person who either voluntarily submits to genetic testing or is ordered to submit to genetic testing pursuant to an order of a court or local child support agency.

(b) The use of genetic testing in a proceeding to determine parentage.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 9.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7550.5.

The following definitions shall apply to this chapter:

(a) “Combined relationship index” means the product of all tested relationship indices.

(b) “Ethnic or racial group” means, for the purpose of genetic testing, a recognized group that a person identifies as the person’s ancestry, or part of the ancestry, or that is identified by other information.

(c) “Genetic testing” means any genetic testing that complies with Section 7552.

(d) “Hypothesized genetic relationship” means an asserted genetic relationship between a person and a child.

(e) “Probability of parentage” means, for the ethnic or racial group to which a person alleged to be a parent belongs, the probability that a hypothesized genetic relationship is supported, compared to the probability that a genetic relationship is supported between the child and a random person of the ethnic or racial group used in the
 hypothesized genetic relationship, expressed as a percentage incorporating the combined relationship index and a prior probability. 

(f) “Relationship index” means a likelihood ratio that compares the probability of a genetic marker given a hypothesized genetic relationship and the probability of the genetic marker given a genetic relationship between the child and a random person of the ethnic or racial group used in the hypothesized genetic relationship.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 876, Sec. 10.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7551.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), in a civil action or proceeding in which parentage is a relevant fact, the court may, upon its own initiative or upon suggestion made by or on behalf of any person who is involved, and shall upon motion of any party to the action or proceeding made at a time so as not to delay the proceedings unduly, order the woman who gave birth, the child, and the alleged genetic parent to submit to genetic testing.

(b) (1) Genetic testing shall not be used for any of the following purposes:

(A) To challenge the parentage of a person who is a parent pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 7613, except to resolve a dispute whether the child was conceived through assisted reproduction.

(B) To challenge the parentage of a person who is a parent pursuant to Section 7962, except to resolve a dispute whether the gestational carrier surrogate is a genetic parent.

(C) To establish the parentage of a person who is a donor pursuant to Section 7613, except to resolve a dispute whether the child was conceived through assisted reproduction.

(2) If the child has a presumed parent pursuant to Section 7540, a motion for genetic testing is governed by Section 7541.

(3) If the child has a parent whose parentage has been previously
 established in a judgment, a request for genetic testing shall be
 governed by Section 7647.7.

(4) A court shall not order genetic testing if the genetic testing would be used to establish the parentage of a person who is prohibited under this division from establishing parentage based on evidence of genetic testing.

(c) A court shall not order in utero genetic testing.

(d) In any case under this division in which genetic testing is ordered, the following shall apply:

(1) If a party refuses to submit to genetic testing, the court may resolve the question of parentage against that party or enforce its order if the rights of others and the interests of justice so require.

(2) The refusal of a party to submit to genetic testing is admissible in evidence in any proceeding to determine parentage.
